Hawaii statutes.
[§466-34] Enrollment and participation.
(a) Every firm, including the Hawaii offices and Hawaii engagements of foreign
or multistate firms, that is required to obtain a firm permit to practice
pursuant to section 466-7 shall undergo a peer review every three years. The
firm's Hawaii offices, if any, and Hawaii attest engagements shall be included
in the scope of the peer review performed in accordance with the American
Institute of Certified Public Accountants Standards for Performing and
Reporting on Peer Reviews.

(b) All firms subject to this part and
performing Hawaii attest work as of December 31, 2014, shall enroll in the
applicable program of an approved sponsoring organization by December 31, 2015,
notify the board of enrollment in that program, and have a peer review
performed by December 31, 2017.

(c) Any firm that begins performing Hawaii
attest work after December 31, 2014, shall:

(1) Notify the board within thirty days of the
beginning of the performance of attest work;

(2) Enroll in the applicable programs of an approved
sponsoring organization within one year from its initial licensing date or the
performance of Hawaii attest work that requires a peer review;

(3) Provide the board with enrollment information
within one year of the date the Hawaii attest work was first performed;

(4) Have a peer review performed within eighteen
months of the date the Hawaii attest work was first performed;

(5) Adopt the peer review due date assigned by the
sponsoring organization and notify the board of the peer review due date within
thirty days of its assignment; and

(6) Schedule and begin an additional review within
three years of the previous review's due date, or earlier if required by the
sponsoring organization or the board; provided that the firm shall be
responsible for anticipating its needs for peer review services in sufficient
time to enable the reviewer to complete the review by the assigned review due
date.

(d) A firm that does not perform Hawaii attest
work shall be exempt from the peer review process.

(e) If a firm is merged, combined, dissolved,
or separated, the sponsoring organization shall determine which resultant firm
shall be considered the succeeding firm. The succeeding firm shall retain its
peer review status and the review due date.

(f) The board shall accept extensions granted
by the sponsoring organization to complete a peer review; provided that the
board is notified by the firm within twenty days of the date that an extension
is granted. The board may also grant a firm an extension of time to comply
with the peer review requirement of this part based on a showing of hardship,
including reasons of health, military service, or other good cause as
determined by the board.

(g) A firm that has been rejected by a sponsoring
organization for any reason shall make a request in writing to the board for
authorization to enroll in a program of another sponsoring organization.

(h) A firm that chooses to enroll in a program
of another sponsoring organization pursuant to subsection (g) may do so;
provided that the firm authorizes the previous sponsoring organization to
communicate to the succeeding sponsoring organization any outstanding
corrective actions related to the firm's most recent peer review. Any
outstanding corrective actions shall be cleared and outstanding fees paid prior
to the transfer between sponsoring organizations.

(i) An out-of-state firm performing Hawaii
attest work shall comply with this part.

(j) If a firm is subject to inspections
pursuant to the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002, as amended, and also performs
Hawaii attest work not subject to those inspections, the firm shall enroll in a
peer review program for review of its non-public company Hawaii attest work in
addition to the firm inspection program required by the public company
accounting oversight board. [L 2012, c 324, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next